Hawaii statutes.
[§321H-2] Neurotrauma system. The
department of health shall develop, lead, administer, coordinate, monitor,
evaluate, and set direction for a comprehensive system to support and provide
services for survivors of neurotrauma injuries. [L 2002, c 160, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next